California statutes. Elections Code
(2) Print an affidavit number on the provisional ballot envelope.

(3) Provide notice to the Secretary of State no later than
 the 15th day before any election that provisional ballot envelopes will be used as affidavits of registration in that election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 113, Sec. 2.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2161.

The Secretary of State shall print, or cause to be printed, the blank forms of the affidavits of registration and voter registration cards prescribed by this code. The Secretary of State shall bind and number, or cause to be bound and numbered, affidavits of registration and voter registration cards as required by this code. The Secretary of State shall supply the forms to the county elections official in quantities and at times as requested by the county elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2162.

(a) No affidavits of registration other than those provided by the Secretary of State to the county elections officials, provisional ballot envelopes that comply with Section 2160, or the national voter registration forms authorized pursuant to the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.) shall be used for the registration of voters.

(b) A voter registration card shall not be altered, defaced, or changed in any way, other than by the insertion of a mailing address and the affixing of postage, if mailed, or as otherwise specifically
 authorized by the Secretary of State, before distribution of the cards.

(c) The affidavit portion of a voter registration card shall not be marked, stamped, or partially or fully completed by a person other than an elector attempting to register to vote or by a person assisting the elector in completing the affidavit at the request of the elector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 113, Sec. 3.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2163.

The Secretary of State shall prepare an appropriate voter registration logo that may be displayed by offices, stores, and other establishments indicating the availability of voter registration for the public. The Secretary of State, upon request, shall provide these logos free of charge to any interested person or organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 33.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2164.

(a) The Secretary of State shall pay all postage for all of the following:

(1) Mailing of the voter notification and the address correction service pursuant to Section 2153.

(2) Return to the county elections official of the affidavits of registration pursuant to Section 2157.

(3) Mailing of blank voter registration cards pursuant to subdivision (c) of
 Section 2158.

(4) Any mailing of blank voter registration cards pursuant to programs adopted under Section 2105.

(b) All payments made pursuant to this section shall be made directly from funds appropriated to the Secretary of State for this purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2165.

Affidavits of registration shall be processed immediately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 34.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2166.

(a) Any person filing with the county elections official a new affidavit of registration or reregistration may have the information relating to his or her residence address, telephone number, and email address appearing on the affidavit, or any list or roster or index prepared therefrom, declared confidential upon order of a superior court issued upon a showing of good cause that a life-threatening circumstance exists to the voter or a member of the voter’s household, and naming the county elections official as a party.

(b) Any person granted confidential voter status under subdivision (a) shall:

(1) Provide a valid mailing address and be considered a vote by mail voter for all subsequent elections or until the county elections official is notified otherwise by the court or in writing by the voter. A voter requesting termination of vote by mail status thereby consents to placement of his or her residence address, telephone number, and email address in the roster of voters.

(2) The elections official, in producing any list, roster, or index
 shall exclude voters with a confidential voter status.

(3) Within 60 days of moving to a new county, obtain an order from the superior court of the new county pursuant to subdivision (a). The elections official of the new county, upon notice of the confidential voter moving into the county, shall do all of the following: 

(A) Contact the confidential voter and provide information regarding the application for confidential voter status in the new county.

(B) Honor the confidential voter status from the former county for 60 days from the date of notice.

(C) Pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), exclude the confidential voter in any list,
 roster, or index during the 60-day period.

(D) Remove the confidential voter status if the new voter has not provided a court order to the new county during the 60-day period.

(c) No action in negligence may be maintained against any government entity or officer or employee thereof as a result of the disclosure of the information which is the subject of this section unless by a showing of gross negligence or willfulness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 35.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2166.5.

(a) Any person filing with the county elections official a new affidavit of registration or reregistration may have the information relating to their residence address, telephone number, and email address appearing on the affidavit, or any list or roster or index prepared therefrom, declared confidential upon presentation of certification that the person is a participant in the Address Confidentiality for Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, and Stalking program pursuant to Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code,
 or a participant in the Address Confidentiality for Reproductive Health Care Service Providers, Employees, Volunteers, Patients, and Other Individuals Who Face Threats or Violence Because of Work for a Public Entity program pursuant to Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 6215) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) Any person granted confidential voter status under
 subdivision (a) shall:

(1) Provide a valid mailing address and be considered a vote by mail voter for all subsequent elections and all subsequent reregistrations inside or outside the county until the county elections official is notified otherwise by the Secretary of State or in writing by the voter. A voter requesting termination of vote by mail status thereby consents to placement of their residence address, telephone number, and email address in the roster of voters.

(2) The elections official, in producing any list, roster, or index shall exclude voters with a confidential voter status.

(c) An action in negligence shall not be maintained against any government entity or officer or employee thereof as a
 result of the disclosure of the information that is the subject of this section unless by a showing of gross negligence or willfulness.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to any person granted confidentiality upon receipt by the county elections official of a written notice by the address confidentiality program manager of the withdrawal, invalidation, expiration, or termination of the program participant’s certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 554, Sec. 1.   (SB 1131)   Effective September 26, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2166.7.

(a) If authorized by the county board of supervisors, a county elections official shall, upon application of a public safety officer, make confidential that officer’s residence address, telephone number, and email address appearing on the affidavit of registration, in accordance with the terms and conditions of this section.

(b) The application by the public safety officer shall contain a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the person is a public safety officer as defined in subdivision (f) and that a life-threatening circumstance exists to the officer or a member of the officer’s family. The application shall be a public record.

(c) The confidentiality granted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall terminate no more than two years after commencement, as determined by the county elections official. The officer may submit a new application for confidentiality pursuant to subdivision (a), and the new request may be granted for an additional period of not more than two years.

(d) Any person granted confidential voter status under subdivision (a) shall:

(1) Provide a valid mailing address and be considered a vote by mail voter for all subsequent elections or until the county elections official is notified otherwise by the Secretary of State or in writing by the voter. A voter requesting termination of vote by mail status thereby consents to placement of the voter’s residence address, telephone
 number, and email address in the roster of voters.

(2) The elections official, in producing any list, roster, or index, shall exclude voters with a confidential voter status.

(3) Within 60 days of moving to a new county, if available in the new county, apply for confidential voter status pursuant to subdivision (a). The elections official of the new county, upon notice of the confidential voter moving into the county, shall do all of the following:

(A) Contact the confidential voter and provide information regarding the application for confidential voter status in the new county.

(B) Honor the confidential voter status from the former county for 60 days from
 the date of notice.

(C) Pursuant to paragraph (2), exclude the confidential voter in any list, roster, or index during the 60-day period.

(D) Remove the confidential voter status if the new voter has not obtained or cannot obtain confidential voter status pursuant to this section in the new county during the 60-day period.

(e) No action in negligence may be maintained against any government entity or officer or employee thereof as a result of the disclosure of the information that is the subject of this section unless by a showing of gross negligence or willfulness.

(f) “A public safety officer” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a), (d), (e), (f),
 or (j) of Section 7920.535 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   (AB 3284)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2166.8.

(a) A county elections official shall, upon application of a qualified worker, make confidential that worker’s residence address, telephone number, and email address appearing on the affidavit of registration, in accordance with the terms and conditions of this section.

(b) The application by the qualified worker shall contain a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the person is a qualified worker as defined in subdivision (f) and that a life-threatening circumstance exists as to the qualified worker or a member of the worker’s family. The application shall be a public record.

(c) The
 confidentiality granted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall terminate no more than two years after commencement, as determined by the county elections official. The officer may submit a new application for confidentiality pursuant to subdivision (a), and the new request may be granted for an additional period of not more than two years.

(d) The following apply to a person granted confidential voter status under subdivision (a):

(1) The elections official, in producing any list, roster, or index, shall exclude voters with a confidential voter status.

(2) The person shall, within 60 days of moving to a new county,
 apply for confidential voter status pursuant to subdivision (a). The elections official of the new county, upon notice of the confidential voter moving into the county, shall do all of the following:

(A) Contact the confidential voter and provide information regarding the application for confidential voter status in the new county.

(B) Honor the confidential voter status from the former county for 60-days from the date of notice.

(C) Pursuant to paragraph (1), exclude the confidential voter in any list, roster, or index during the 60-day period.

(D) Remove the confidential voter status if the new voter has not obtained or cannot obtain confidential
 voter status pursuant to this section in the new county during the 60-day period.

(e) An action in negligence shall not be maintained against any government entity or officer or employee thereof as a result of the disclosure of the information that is the subject of this section except by a showing of gross negligence or willfulness.

(f) “Qualified worker” means a person who is employed by or contracts with the Secretary of State or a local election office who performs election-related work and interacts with the public or is observed by the public doing election-related work, but does not include a person who is a precinct board member who does not otherwise perform election-related work. For the purposes of this section, a qualified worker is not limited to those who exclusively perform
 direct election-related work for the Secretary of State or local election offices.

(g) The Secretary of State shall submit to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, no later than January 10 of each year, a report that includes the total number of applications received for the program established by this section. The report shall disclose the number of program participants within each county and shall also describe any allegations of misuse relating to election purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 554, Sec. 2.   (SB 1131)   Effective September 26, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2166.9.

(a) For purposes of this section, “elected official or candidate” means a federal, state, or local elected official or a candidate for an elected federal, state, or local office.

(b) An elected official or candidate shall have their residence address, telephone number, and email address appearing on the affidavit of registration made confidential in accordance with the terms and conditions of this section.

(c) (1) When a person files nomination papers for an elected federal or state office, the Secretary of State shall provide to each county elections official a list identifying each elected official or candidate residing in each respective county.

(2) When a person files nomination papers for an elected local office, the county elections official shall add that individual’s name to a list identifying each elected official or candidate residing in that county. The county elections official shall periodically update the list for each election cycle.

(3) Within five business days of receipt of the list described in paragraph (1) or, for an office for which nomination papers are filed with the county elections official, within five business days of the filing of nomination papers with the county elections official, the county elections official shall make confidential that elected official or candidate’s residence address, telephone number, and email address appearing on the affidavit of registration.

(d) (1) The county elections official, in
 producing any list, roster, or index, shall exclude voters with a confidential voter status pursuant to this section.

(2) Within 60 days of moving to a new county, if available in the new county, the elected official or candidate shall apply for confidential voter status pursuant to this section. The elections official of the new county, upon notice of the confidential voter moving into the county, shall do all of the following:

(A) Contact the confidential voter and provide information regarding the application for confidential voter status in the new county.

(B) Honor the confidential voter status from the former county for 60 days from the date of notice.

(C) Pursuant to paragraph (1), exclude the confidential voter in any list, roster, or index
 during the 60-day period.

(D) Remove the confidential voter status if the new voter has not obtained or cannot obtain confidential voter status pursuant to this section in the new county during the 60-day period.

(e) An elected official or candidate shall contact their county elections official to ensure their voter registration record has been made confidential in accordance with the terms and conditions of this section.

(f) An elected official or candidate’s residence address, telephone number, and email address shall remain confidential until, for an elected official, the official no longer holds the office or, for a candidate, the winning candidate takes office.

(g) A county or county elections official shall not be liable for taking or failing to
 take the actions described in this section when the county or county elections official has received erroneous information from the Secretary of State.

(h) An action in negligence shall not be maintained against any government entity or officer or employee thereof as a result of the disclosure of the information that is the subject of this section, except by a showing of gross negligence or willfulness.

(i) An elected official or candidate holding office as of the effective date of this section shall contact their county elections official to ensure their voter registration record has been made confidential in accordance with the terms and conditions of this section. County elections officials shall make the elected official’s information confidential when contacted by the elected official or candidate.

(j) (1) A candidate who does not wish to have confidential voter status may opt out when completing their candidate filing statement provided by a county elections official.

(2) (A) An elected official who wishes to opt out of confidential voter status may submit a letter to the county elections official declaring their decision to be exempt from the requirements of this section.

(B) A request pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include the elected official’s full name, voter registration address, and a clear statement that they wish to opt out of having their residence address, telephone number, and email address made confidential pursuant to this section.

(C) Upon receipt of the request, the county elections official shall remove the confidential designation from the individual’s voter
 registration record within five business days.

(D) The county elections official shall notify the Secretary of State and any other relevant local elections officials of the decision to opt out within five business days of processing the request.

(E) An elected official who opts out may reapply for confidential voter status at any time while serving in or running for office, and confidential voter status shall be reinstated in accordance with this section upon receipt of the request.

(k) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, an elected official or candidate’s residence address, telephone number, and email address made confidential pursuant to this section may be disclosed only for bona fide journalistic or governmental purposes. A person seeking an elected official or candidate’s confidential
 residence address, telephone number, and email address for a journalistic purpose pursuant to this section shall apply to the Secretary of State or to a county elections official as specified in paragraph (2).

(2) (A) A person seeking a federal or state elected official or candidate’s confidential residence address, telephone number, and email address for journalistic purposes shall submit all of the following to the Secretary of State:

(i) A completed California Voter Registration File Request application.

(ii) A letter of authorization or affiliation from the media outlet that the person represents. If the person submitting the request is a member of the media, a press pass may be submitted in lieu of a letter of authorization.

(iii) A
 declaration under penalty of perjury attesting to the intended journalistic use of the information.

(B) A person seeking a local elected official or candidate’s confidential residence address, telephone number, and email address for journalistic purposes shall submit requests to the county elections official or other local elections official.

(C) A county elections official shall process a request for a local elected official or candidate’s confidential residence address, telephone number, and email address for journalistic purposes consistent with the requirements of regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.

(D) The county elections official shall retain records of all requests for, and disclosures of, a local elected official or candidate’s confidential residence address, telephone number,
 and email address for journalistic purposes. The county elections official may reject a request that does not clearly adhere to the requirements of this subdivision.

(3) For purposes of this chapter, “journalistic purposes” shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   (AB 1392)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2167.

Upon the personal or written application of any person, the county elections official shall, at a fee not to exceed one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50), provide the applicant with a certified copy of the entries upon the register relating to the applicant.

A certified copy of an uncanceled affidavit of registration is prima facie evidence that the person named in the entry is a voter of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2168.

The Secretary of State shall establish and maintain a statewide system to facilitate the reporting of election results and voter and candidate information, and to otherwise administer and enhance election administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 38.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Conditional Voter Registration [2170. - 2173.]

2170.

(a) “Conditional voter registration” means a properly executed affidavit of registration that is delivered by the registrant to the county elections official during the 14 days immediately preceding an election or on election day and which may be deemed effective pursuant to this article after the elections official processes the affidavit, determines the registrant’s eligibility to register, and validates the registrant’s information, as specified in subdivision (c).

(b) In addition to other methods of voter registration provided by this code, an elector who is otherwise qualified to register to vote under this code and Section 2 of Article II of the California Constitution,
 including military and overseas voters and voters with disabilities, may complete a conditional voter registration and cast a provisional ballot, or nonprovisional ballot under subdivision (f), during the 14 days immediately preceding an election or on election day pursuant to this article.

(c) (1) A conditional voter registration shall be deemed effective if the county elections official is able to determine before or during the canvass period for the election that the registrant is eligible to register to vote and that the information provided by the registrant on the registration affidavit matches information contained in a database maintained by the Department of Motor Vehicles or the federal Social Security Administration.

(2) If the information provided by
 the registrant on the registration affidavit cannot be verified pursuant to paragraph (1) but the registrant is otherwise eligible to vote, the registrant shall be issued a unique identification number pursuant to Section 2150 and the conditional voter registration shall be deemed effective.

(d) The county elections official shall offer conditional voter registration and voting pursuant to this article, in accordance with all of the following procedures:

(1) The elections official shall provide conditional voter registration and voting pursuant to this article at all permanent and satellite offices of the county elections official and all polling places in the county.

(2) The elections official shall advise registrants that a conditional
 voter registration will be effective only if the registrant is determined to be eligible to register to vote for the election and the information provided by the registrant on the registration affidavit is verified pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) The elections official shall conduct the receipt and handling of each conditional voter registration and offer and receive a corresponding ballot in a manner that protects the secrecy of the ballot and allows the elections official to process the registration, determine the registrant’s eligibility to register, and validate the registrant’s information before counting or rejecting the corresponding ballot.

(4) After receiving a conditional voter registration, the elections official shall process the registration, determine the registrant’s eligibility
 to register, and attempt to validate the registrant’s information.

(5) If a conditional registration is deemed effective, the elections official shall include the corresponding ballot in the official canvass.

(e) After receiving a conditional voter registration, the elections official shall provide a provisional ballot in accordance with the following procedures:

(1) If the elections office, satellite office, or polling place is equipped with an electronic poll book, or other means to determine the voter’s precinct, the elections official shall provide the voter with a ballot for the voter’s precinct if the ballot is available. The ballot may be cast by any means available at the elections office, satellite
 office, or polling place.

(2) If the elections official is unable to determine the voter’s precinct, or a ballot for the voter’s precinct is unavailable, the elections official shall provide the voter with a ballot and inform the voter that only the votes for the candidates and measures on which the voter would be entitled to vote in the voter’s assigned precinct may be counted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 14310. The ballot may be cast by any means available at the elections office, satellite office, or polling place.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), if the elections official is able to determine the voter’s precinct, but a ballot for the voter’s precinct is unavailable, the elections official may inform the voter of the location of the voter’s polling place. A
 voter described in this paragraph shall not be required to vote at the voter’s polling place and may instead, at the voter’s choosing, cast a ballot pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) This subdivision does not apply to elections conducted pursuant to Section 4005.

(f) An elections official may offer a nonprovisional ballot to a registrant if the official does both of the following:

(1) Uses the statewide voter registration database developed in compliance with the requirements of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.) to do all of the following before issuing the nonprovisional ballot:

(A) Verify that the registrant is deemed
 eligible to register to vote.

(B) Verify that the registrant has not voted in the state in that election.

(C) Verify that the registrant has not been included on a roster for that election in another county in the state that is not conducting elections pursuant to Section 4005.

(D) Update the voter’s record to indicate that the voter has voted in that election.

(2) If the registrant has been included on a roster for that election in that county, the official updates that roster to indicate that the voter has voted and shall not be issued another nonprovisional ballot for that election.

(g) The Secretary of State may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section. The Legislature finds and declares that such regulations are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare because the regulations will ensure that elections officials have sufficient time to ensure that elections are held in a safe and accessible manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 479, Sec. 3.   (AB 1762)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2171.

(a) A conditional voter registration accepted under this article shall include the information required by Article 4 (commencing with Section 2150).

(b) A conditional voter registration accepted under this article shall be processed in accordance with general voter registration procedures provided in this chapter and established by regulations adopted by the Secretary of State.

(c) A provisional ballot cast under this article shall be subject to the requirements for provisional voting in Article 5 (commencing with Section 14310) of Chapter 3 of Division
 14.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.   (AB 1436)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2017, by Stats. 2012, Ch. 497, by Sec. 6, pursuant to the certification issued by the Secretary of State on September 26, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2172.

(a) The elections official shall cancel any duplicate voter registrations that may exist as a result of a conditional registration deemed effective and shall cancel the duplicate registrations in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2200).

(b) If it appears that a registrant may have committed fraud within the meaning of Section 18560, the elections official shall immediately notify in writing both the district attorney and the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.   (AB 1436)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2017, by Stats. 2012, Ch. 497, by Sec. 6, pursuant to the certification issued by the Secretary of State on September 26, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2173.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who commits fraud in the execution of a conditional voter registration pursuant to this article shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for up to one year, or a fine up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) In addition to the criminal penalties prescribed in subdivision (a), a person who commits fraud in the execution of a conditional voter registration pursuant to this article shall be subject to a civil fine of an amount up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). An action for a civil penalty under this subdivision may be brought by the Secretary of State or any public prosecutor with jurisdiction.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the prosecution of a person under any other applicable provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.   (AB 1436)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2017, by Stats. 2012, Ch. 497, by Sec. 6, pursuant to the certification issued by the Secretary of State on September 26, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Roster [2183. - 2194.1.]

2183.

(a) The elections official shall supply an electronic copy, or paper copy upon request, of the roster and of supplements to the roster, necessary to bring it up to date, for all elections to be held within the county. The county elections official shall also supply copies of the roster and supplements as may be requested by the elections official of a city, school district, or other body. The name of each voter whose affidavit of registration has been canceled shall be removed from the roster and supplement. The county elections official may charge an amount sufficient to reimburse the county for the expense incurred in preparing and furnishing the roster and supplements.

(b) (1) The roster shall contain the name, address, residence telephone number if furnished, and political party preference of each voter, and also a ruled space to the left of each name, within which to write, in figures, the line number designating the position of the name of the voter.

(2) The name shall include the given name and the middle name or initials, if any. At the affiant’s option, the given name may be preceded by the designation “Miss,” “Ms.,” “Mrs.,” or “Mr.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 13.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2184.

Upon request of any Member of the Legislature, of Congress, or any candidate who is to be voted for in the county, in a city therein, or in a political subdivision of either, or upon written demand of his or her campaign committee, of any committee for or against any proposed ballot measure, or of any committee for or against any referendum or initiative measure for which legal publication has been made, the county elections official shall furnish to the Member of the Legislature, of Congress, or to either the candidate or his or her campaign committee or to the ballot measure committee the roster for the primary and general elections in which the Member of the Legislature or Congress may participate as a candidate, or for the election in which the candidate
 will participate, or the ballot measure will be voted upon, at a charge of fifty cents ($0.50) per thousand names. All moneys collected shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 14.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2185.

Upon written request of the chair or vice chair of a party state central committee or of the chair of a party county central committee, the county elections official shall furnish to each committee, without charge therefor, the roster for the primary and general elections, for any special election at which a partisan office is to be filled, or for any statewide special election. The county elections official shall furnish one copy per election in an electronic form, or in paper form upon request, of the rosters specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 15.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2187.

(a) Each county elections official shall provide notice to the Secretary of State that the following information is available:

(1) The total number of voters in the county.

(2) The number registered as preferring each qualified political party.

(3) The number registered as preferring nonqualified parties.

(4) The number registered without choosing a political party preference.

(5) The number of voters by political party preferences in each of the following political subdivisions, located in whole or in part
 within the county:

(A) A supervisorial district.

(B) Congressional district.

(C) Senate district.

(D) Assembly district.

(E) Board of Equalization district.

(F) Cities and unincorporated areas.

(b) The Secretary of State, within 30 days after receiving the information specified in subdivision (a), shall compile a statewide list showing the number of voters, by party preferences, in the state and in each county, city, supervisorial district, Assembly district, Senate district, and congressional district in the state. A copy of this list shall be made available,
 upon request, to any elector in this state.

(c) The county elections officials shall prepare the information referenced in subdivision (a) and provide notice to the Secretary of State at the following times:

(1) On the 135th day before each presidential primary and before each direct primary, with respect to all voters who are registered voters on the 154th day before the primary election.

(2) Not less than 50 days before the primary election, with respect to all voters who are registered voters on the 60th day before the primary election.

(3) Not less than seven days before the primary election, with respect to all voters who are registered voters on the 15th day before the primary election.

(4) Not less than 102 days before each presidential general election, with respect to all voters who are registered voters on the 123rd day before the presidential general election.

(5) Not less than 50 days before the general election, with respect to all voters who are registered voters on the 60th day before the general election.

(6) Not less than seven days before the general election, with respect to all voters who are registered voters on the 15th day before the general election.

(7) On or before March 1 of each odd-numbered year, with respect to all voters who are registered voters on February 10.

(d) The Secretary of State may adopt regulations prescribing additional regular reporting times, except that the total number of reporting
 times in any one calendar year shall not exceed 12.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 269, Sec. 1.   (AB 3258)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.

(a) Any application for voter registration information available pursuant to law and maintained by the Secretary of State or by the elections official of any county shall be made pursuant to this section.

(b) The application shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The printed or typed name of the applicant in full.

(2) The complete residence address and complete business address of the applicant, giving street and number. If no street or number exists, a postal mailing address as well as an adequate designation sufficient to
 readily ascertain the location.

(3) The telephone number of the applicant, if one exists.

(4) The number of the applicant’s driver’s license, state identification card, or other identification approved by the Secretary of State if the applicant does not have a driver’s license or state identification card.

(5) The specific information requested.

(6) A statement of the intended use of the information requested.

(c) If the application is on behalf of a person other than the applicant, the applicant shall, in addition to the information required by subdivision (b), set forth all of the following:

(1) The name of the person, organization, company, committee,
 association, or group requesting the voter registration information, including their complete mailing address and telephone number.

(2) The name of the person authorizing or requesting the applicant to obtain the voter registration information.
